Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 4. LIABILITY IN TORT

CHAPTER 80. TRESPASS: OUTDOOR SIGN

Sec. 80.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "sign" means an outdoor structure, sign, display, light device, figure, painting, drawing, message, plaque, poster, billboard, or any other thing that is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.04(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 80.002. TRESPASS. A trespass occurs when an individual:

(1) erects or places a sign on premises without the permission of the owner of the premises; or

(2) after the expiration or termination of an agreement with the owner of the premises for the erection, placement, or maintenance of a sign on the premises and before the expiration of the period described by Section 80.003(b)(2), fails to remove or abandons a sign or fails to obtain from the owner of the premises permission for the continued use or maintenance of the sign on the premises.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.04(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 80.003. DAMAGES. (a) The owner of the premises is entitled to recover damages equal to the amount of payments received by or accruing to the owner of the sign from the rental, sale, lease, or other use of the sign during the period after the expiration of the 30th day after the date on which the written notice required by Subsection (b)(1) is received and before the date on which the sign is removed or permission for the continued use or maintenance of the sign is obtained.

(b) The owner of the premises may not recover damages for trespass under this section unless:

(1) the owner of the premises sends, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner of the sign written demand for removal of the sign, stating in detail the act constituting the trespass and the location where the sign has been erected, placed, or maintained; and

(2) the owner of the sign fails to remove the sign or obtain permission from the owner of the premises for the continued use or maintenance of the sign before the 30th day after the date on which the notice described by Subdivision (1) was received.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.04(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.